Utah statutes.
70A-8-303.    Protected purchaser.
(1)  "Protected purchaser" means a purchaser of a certificated or
uncertificated security, or of an interest therein, who:
(a)  gives value;
(b)  does not have notice of any adverse claim to the security; and
(c)  obtains control of the certificated or uncertificated security.
(2)  In addition to acquiring the rights of a purchaser, a protected purchaser
also acquires its interest in the security free of any adverse claim.
